Utah statutes.
53B-16-403.   Interns -- Workers' compensation medical benefits.

(1)  An intern participating in an internship under Section 53B-16-402 is considered to be a volunteer worker of the sponsoring institution of higher education solely for purposes of receiving workers' compensation medical benefits.

(2)  Receipt of medical benefits under Subsection (1) shall be the exclusive remedy against the institution and the cooperating employer for all injuries and occupational diseases as provided under Title 34A, Chapters 2 and 3.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1997 General Session

